New Jersey, session 221, A700.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section, military-connected student means a student enrolled in a public school in the State who is a dependent of a member of: (1)   the armed forces of the United States, including the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, and Coast Guard; (2)   the National Guard; or (1)   any other reserve component of the armed forces. b.    The student-level database maintained by the Department of Education shall include an identifier for military-connected students.  The Commissioner of Education shall include information in the report issued pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1995, c.235 (C.18A:7E-1 et seq.), that summarizes the academic engagement and outcomes of military-connected students, including attendance rates, performance on State assessments, and high school graduation rates.  The information shall be consistent with the provisions of the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (20 U.S.C. s.1232g). 2.    a.  As used in this section, military-connected student means a student enrolled in a public school in the State who is a dependent of a member of: (1)   the armed forces of the United States, including the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, and Coast Guard; (2)   the National Guard; or (3)   any other reserve component of the armed forces. b.    A school district shall notify a classroom teacher of the enrollment of a military-connected student in any class taught by the teacher.  The purpose of the notification is to provide the teacher with the opportunity to monitor a military-connected students level of academic engagement, and to provide additional academic support to the student as needed. c.     A parent or guardian of a military-connected student may opt their child out of being identified to the teacher as a military-connected student, pursuant to subsection b. of this section.  At the request of a parent or guardian, the school district shall not notify a classroom teacher of the enrollment of the military-connected student pursuant to this section. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full school year following the date of enactment.